North Dakota, session 69, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 43-23.5-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-23.5-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Appraisal firm" means any person or entity that exclusively employs persons on an employer
and employee basis for the performance of real estate appraisal services in the normal course
of its business and the real estate appraisal services being performed are in accordance with
the uniform standards of professional appraisal practices.
2. "Appraisal management company" means, in connection with valuing properties collateralizing
mortgage loans or mortgages incorporated into a securitization, any external third party that
oversees a network or panel of more than fifteen certified or licensed appraisers in this state
or twenty-five or more nationally within a given year, that is authorized either by a creditor of a
consumer credit transaction secured by a consumer's principal dwelling or by an underwriter
or other principal in the secondary mortgage markets that engages in appraisal management
services.
3. "Appraisal management services" means to, directly or indirectly, perform any of the following
functions on behalf of a lender, financial institution, client, or any other person in conjunction
with a consumer credit transaction that is secured by a consumer's primary dwelling:
a. Administer an appraiser panel.
b. Recruit, retain, or select appraisers.
c. Qualify, verify licensing or certification, and negotiate fees and service level expectations
with persons who are part of an appraiser panel.
d. Contract with appraisers to perform appraisal assignments.
e. Receive an order for an appraisal from one person, and deliver the order for the
appraisal to an appraiser that is part of an appraiser panel for completion.
f. Manage the process of having an appraisal performed, including providing administrative
duties, such as receiving appraisal orders and reports, submitting completed appraisal
reports to creditors and underwriters, collecting fees from creditors and underwriters for
services provided, and reimbursing appraisers for services performed.
g. Track and determine the status of appraisal orders.
h. Conduct an appraisal review or other quality control of a completed appraisal prior to the
delivery of the appraisal to the person that ordered the appraisal.

H. B. NO. 1080 - PAGE 2
i. Provide a completed appraisal performed by an appraiser to one or more clients.
4. "Appraisal review" means the act or process of developing and communicating an opinion
about the quality of another appraiser's work that was performed as part of an appraisal
assignment related to the appraiser's data collection, analysis, opinions, conclusions, estimate
of value, or compliance with the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice. This
term does not include:
a. A general examination for grammatical, typographical, or other similar errors.
b. A general examination for completeness, including regulatory client requirements, or
both, as specified in the agreement process that does not communicate an opinion.
5. "Appraiser panel" means a network of licensed or certified appraisers who have:
a. Responded to an invitation, request, or solicitation from an appraisal management
company, in any form, to perform appraisals for persons that have ordered appraisals
through the appraisal management company, or to perform appraisals for the appraisal
management company directly, on a periodic basis, as requested and assigned by the
appraisal management company.
b. Been selected and approved by an appraisal management company to perform
appraisals for any client of the appraisal management company that has ordered an
appraisal through the appraisal management company, or to perform appraisals for the
appraisal management company directly, on a periodic basis, as assigned by the
appraisal management company.
6. "Board" means the North Dakota real estate appraiser qualifications and ethics board.
7. "Controlling person" means:
a. An officer, director, or owner of greater than a ten percent interest of a corporation,
partnership, or other business entity seeking to act as an appraisal management
company in this state.
b. An individual employed, appointed, or authorized by an appraisal management company
that has the authority to enter a contractual relationship with other persons for
performance of services requiring registration as an appraisal management company
and has the authority to enter agreements with appraisers for the performance of
appraisals.
c. An individual who possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management or policies of an appraisal management company.
8. "Federal financial institutions regulatory agencies" includes the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office of the comptroller
of the currency, and the national credit union administration.
9. "Federally regulated appraisal management company" means an appraisal management
company that is owned and controlled by an insured depository institution, as defined in 12
U.S.C. 1813 and regulated by the office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of
governors of the federal reserve system, or the federal deposit insurance corporation.
10. "Federally related transaction" means any real estate-related financial transaction which a
federal financial institutions regulatory agency or the resolution trust corporation engages in,
contracts for, or regulates, and requires the services of an appraiser.
10.11. "Real estate-related financial transaction" means any transaction involving:

H. B. NO. 1080 - PAGE 3
a. The sale, lease, purchase, investment in, or exchange of real property, including interests
in property or the financing thereof.
b. The refinancing of real property or interests in real property.
c. The use of real property or interests in property as security for a loan or investment,
including mortgage-backed securities.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 43-23.5-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-23.5-07. Exemptions.
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. An appraisal firm.
2. A federally regulated appraisal management company, or a financial institution, including a
department or unit within the institution, that is regulated by an agency of this state or the
United States government.
3. A person that enters an agreement with an appraiser for the performance of an appraisal that
upon completion results in a report signed by both the appraiser who completed the appraisal
and the appraiser who requested completion of the appraisal.
4. An appraisal management company with an appraisal panel of fewer than sixteen certified or
licensed appraisers in this state or fewer than twenty-five nationally within a given year.
5. An appraisal management company that is a subsidiary owned and controlled by a financial
institution that is subject to appraisal independence standards at least as stringent as those
under chapter 43-23.5-21, if regulated by an agency of this state, or the Truth in Lending Act
[15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.], if regulated by the United States government.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 43-23.5-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-23.5-08. Owner requirements.
1. An appraisal management company applying for, holding, or renewing a registration under this
chapter may not be, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, owned by:
a. An an individual who has had an appraiser license or certification in this state or in any
other state refused, denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked, or
surrendered in lieu of a pending disciplinary proceeding in any jurisdiction and not
subsequently granted or reinstatedfor a substantive cause, as determined by the board.
b. An entity that is owned by any individual who has had an appraiser license or certification
in this state or any other state refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu
of a pending disciplinary proceeding in any jurisdiction and not subsequently granted or
reinstated.
2. Each person that owns more than ten percent of an appraisal management company applying
for, holding, or renewing a registration under this chapter:
a. Must be of good moral character.
b. Shall submit to a criminal background investigation for an initial application or as required
by the board.

H. B. NO. 1080 - PAGE 4
3. Each appraisal management company applying for a registration or for renewal of a
registration under this chapter shall certify to the board on a form prescribed by the board that
the company has reviewed each entity that owns the appraisal management company and
that no entity that owns the appraisal management company is owned by any personan
individual that has had an appraiser license or certification in this state or any other state
refused, denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked, or surrendered in lieu
of a pending disciplinary proceeding in any jurisdiction and not subsequently granted or
reinstatedfor a substantive cause, as determined by the board.
4. An appraisal management company is not barred from registration if the license or certificate
of the appraiser with an ownership interest was not revoked for a substantive cause and has
not been reinstated by the jurisdiction in which the appraiser was licensed or certified.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 43-23.5-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-23.5-15. Retention of records.
1. Each appraisal management company seeking to be registered or to renew an existing
registration in this state shall certify to the board on a form prescribed by the board that the
company maintains a detailed record of each service request that the company receives for
appraisal of real property located in this state.
2. An appraisal management company registered in this state shall retain for five years all
records required to be maintained under this chapter as described in rules. This five-year
period shall commence on the date of the final action by the appraisal management company
for each individual transaction or, if the appraisal management company is notified that the
transaction is involved in litigation, the five-year period shall commence on the date the
litigation is finally disposed.
3. All records required to be maintained by the registered appraisal management company
maymust, upon request by the board, be made available for inspection and copying by the
board on reasonable notice to the appraisal management company.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 43-23.5-21 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. Except within the first ninety days after an independent appraiser is added to an appraiser
page, removeRemove an independent appraiser from an appraiser panel without prior written
notice to the appraiser, with the prior written notice including evidence of the following, if
applicable:
a. The appraiser's illegal conduct.
b. A violation of the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice, this chapter, or the
rules adopted by the board.
c. Improper or unprofessional conduct.

H. B. NO. 1080 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1080.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State